Vermont, session 2025-2026, S296.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 1902 is added to read:
§ 1902. DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT; MUNICIPAL PROTECTIONS
(a) Guarantee. A developer for a project financed with tax increment
financing shall guarantee in its development agreement with the municipality
that the project will generate sufficient tax increment to fund the municipality’s
debt service payments on its financing for the project for the duration of the
VT LEG #385749 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.296
2026 Page 2 of 4
TIF district or housing development site. If the developer has no assets of its
own, the parent company of the developer that owns project assets shall
provide the same guarantee.
(b) Security. The guarantee shall be secured to the satisfaction of the
municipality and may be evidenced by a letter of credit, performance bond,
special assessment lien, mortgage, personal or corporate guarantee, or
alternative form of security satisfactory to the municipality.
(c) Additional protections. A developer for a project financed with tax
increment financing shall additionally provide at least one of the following
provisions in its development agreement with the municipality:
(1) a protection for the taxable value of the property subject to
development, such as casualty insurance, reconstruction in the event of
destruction, or a prohibition on contesting the property’s assessed value;
(2) a protection to ensure the municipality may proceed with the project
on its own in the event of developer failure, such as license or ownership of
engineering or architectural plans; or
(3) an equity position in the developer, such as through a profit-sharing
arrangement.
Sec. 2. 24 V.S.A. § 1909 is amended to read:
§ 1909. HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE AGREEMENT
VT LEG #385749 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.296
2026 Page 3 of 4
(a) The housing infrastructure agreement for a housing infrastructure
project shall:
(1) clearly identify the sponsor for the housing infrastructure project;
(2) clearly identify the developer and the housing development for the
housing development site;
(3) obligate the tax increments retained pursuant to section 1910c of this
subchapter for not more than the financing and related costs for the housing
infrastructure project;
(4) provide that any housing unit within the housing development be
offered exclusively as a primary residence until all indebtedness for the
housing infrastructure project of which the housing development is part has
been retired, provided that this condition shall be satisfied by biennially
providing a landlord certificate or homestead declaration; and
(5) provide for performance assurances to reasonably secure the
obligations of all parties under the housing infrastructure agreement; and
(6) comply with the requirements for development agreements pursuant
to section 1902 of this title.
(b) A municipality shall provide notice of the terms of the housing
infrastructure agreement for the municipality’s housing infrastructure project
to the legal voters of the municipality and shall provide the same information
as set forth in subsection 1910a(e) of this subchapter.
VT LEG #385749 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.296
2026 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385749 v.2